Missouri, session 2026, HB1640.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.068, to read as follows:
173.068. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Disabled applicant", an individual with a documented lifelong disability or
static disability;
(2) "Lifelong disability", an underlying neurodevelopmental or medical
condition that persists across the individual's lifespan. Such conditions are
nonprogressive in nature, though symptoms may be mitigated or managed through
appropriate interventions. Lifelong disabilities include, but are not limited to, specific
learning disabilities such as dyslexia, attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD),
and autism spectrum disorder (ASD);
(3) "Public institution of higher education", a community college, state college,
or state university located in Missouri that receives state moneys;
(4) "Standardized applicant examination" includes, but is not limited to, the
following:
(a) Advanced Placement (AP) exams;
(b) American College Testing program examination (ACT);
(c) Classic Learning Test (CLT);
(d) Graduate Management Admission Test (GMAT);
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1640 2
(e) Law School Admission Test (LSAT);
(f) Medical College Admission Test (MCAT);
(g) Preliminary Scholastic Aptitude Test/National Merit Scholarship Qualifying
Test (PSAT/NMSQT); and
(h) Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT);
(5) "Static disability, a nonprogressive condition in which the underlying
impairment and its inherent severity remain stable over time. A static disability is
characterized by a fixed level of functional limitation that does not substantially
improve, deteriorate, or change in nature, even though the individual's performance,
skills, or adaptive strategies may develop through intervention or experience.
2. For the 2027-28 academic year and all subsequent academic years, a public
institution of higher education shall not accept standardized applicant examination
scores from an entity that requires a disabled applicant to have taken a comprehensive
test for a documented disability within the two years before the date of the standardized
applicant examination in order for the disabled applicant to receive allowed
accommodations under:
(1) The federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C.
Section 1400 et seq., as amended;
(2) Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794,
as amended; or
(3) The federal Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), 42 U.S.C. Section 12101
et seq., as amended.
✔